Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3313
Supervisor, defined.

Supervisor means a licensed veterinarian or licensed veterinary technician as required by statute or rule or regulation for the particular delegated task being performed by a veterinary technician or unlicensed assistant.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1095.